Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 23

Miscellaneous Provisions

71-5-2301. Allowances by county legislative body.

The county legislative body may, in its discretion, allow and pay to poor persons who may become chargeable as paupers, and who will probably be benefited thereby, such sums or such annual allowance, to be paid according to the direction of the legislative body, as will not exceed the charge of their maintenance in the ordinary mode.

Code 1858, § 1621; Shan., § 2705; Code 1932, § 4821; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1001, 14-20-301.

71-5-2302. Exemption from road service.

The county legislative body may exempt from working on public roads any person unable, by manual labor or physical exertion, to make a support, whenever it appears to be just and right.

Code 1858, § 1620 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 97); Shan., § 2704; Code 1932, § 4820; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; Acts 1979, ch. 23, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1002, 14-20-302.

Cross-References. County legislative body power to exempt, §5-5-125.

71-5-2303. Contract for support with use of farm.

The county legislative body may also let out the support of the poor, with the use and occupancy of the poorhouse and farm, for a period not exceeding three (3) years.

Code 1858, § 1615; Shan., § 2699; Code 1932, § 4816; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1003, 14-20-303.

71-5-2304. Contracts for support of poor.

The county legislative body may also contract with any person for the support of any or all the poor of the county, upon such terms as may be deemed reasonable, for a period not exceeding one (1) year.

Code 1858, § 1616; Shan., § 2700; Code 1932, § 4817; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1004, 14-20-304.

71-5-2305. Employment of poor by contracts.

Such contractors under §§71-5-2303 and71-5-2304 may employ a poor person in any work for which such person's age, health, and strength are competent, but subject to the supervision of the commissioners of the poor, and, in the last resort, of the county legislative body.

Code 1858, § 1617; Shan., § 2701; Code 1932, § 4818; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1005, 14-20-305.

71-5-2306. Supervision of contractors.

The commissioners of the poor are required, if the poor of the county, or any of them, are bound or farmed out, as provided in §§71-5-2303 —71-5-2305, to:

Examine and report upon the manner in which such poor are kept and treated;

Prescribe the manner in which they shall be maintained and provided for; and

Report the result of the examination in the premises, and their conduct;

to the county legislative body.

Code 1858, § 1613; Shan., § 2697; Code 1932, § 4814; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1006, 14-20-306.

71-5-2307. Setting aside contract.

The county legislative body has the power, upon good cause shown, to set aside any contract letting out the support of the poor as above, making proper allowances for the time it has been in operation.

Code 1858, § 1618; Shan., § 2702; Code 1932, § 4819; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1007, 14-20-307.

71-5-2308. Contracts for hospital care.

For the purpose of caring for indigent sick or injured persons, the county legislative bodies are empowered to enter into contract with any reputable hospital for the care and treatment of indigent sick or injured persons, and may make annual contracts with such hospitals for a right, on the part of the county, to the use of one (1) or more beds in the hospital in which the county shall have the right to place patients for hospital treatment to be rendered by the hospital.

Acts 1911, ch. 54, § 1; Shan., § 2706a1; Code 1932, § 4823; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1008, 14-20-308.

71-5-2309. Order to receive county patient.

Whenever any county legislative body has so contracted, and it has been made satisfactorily to appear to the county mayor of any county that a sick or injured person is unable on account of poverty to procure proper care and medical attention, the county mayor shall issue an order to the hospital to receive the person for treatment as a county patient.

Acts 1911, ch. 54, § 2; Shan., § 2706a2; Code 1932, § 4824; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1009, 14-20-309; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

71-5-2310. Hospitalization attained by county mayor.

In the event any county legislative body fails to make such an annual contract, or in case all the beds contracted for shall at any time be filled, and is made satisfactorily to appear to the county mayor that a sick or injured person is unable on account of poverty to procure necessary care and medical attention, the county mayor may contract with such hospital to take charge of and render to such person the care and medical attention necessary during the illness.

Acts 1911, ch. 54, § 3; Shan., § 2706a3; Code 1932, § 4825; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1010, 14-20-310; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, c. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

71-5-2311. Payment for hospitalization.

Whenever any hospital has entered into either or both of such contracts with any county, the hospital shall render monthly statements to the county mayor of the county showing the name and address of each patient so received and treated at the expense of the county, and the length of time treated, and an account for the keep of the patient, and whether the patient was treated under the annual contract plan or by special contract with the county mayor as provided in this part.

Upon the presentation of the account, the county mayor shall inspect the account, and if found correct, shall issue a county warrant for same, which shall be paid as other county expenses.

Acts 1911, ch. 54, § 5; Shan., § 2706a5; Code 1932, § 4827; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1011, 14-20-311; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

71-5-2312. Attendance of patients by county physicians.

Whenever any county patient, coming from the county wherein such hospital is located, is without the services of a regular physician, it shall become the duty of the county physician of the county wherein the hospital is situated to attend the patient and to administer medical treatment during the patient's retention in the hospital.

Acts 1911, ch. 54, § 4; Shan., § 2706a4; Code 1932, § 4826; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1012, 14-20-312.

71-5-2313. Welfare recipients may choose optometrist or physician — Exception — Fee schedule.

Whenever under any program for aid to the indigent, the aged, the blind or any other group, which program is supported in whole or in part by funds of the state or of any metropolitan, municipal or county government in this state and which includes services within the lawful scope of practice of a duly licensed optometrist as defined in §63-8-102, the recipient of such aid or the recipient's parent, guardian or conservator shall be entitled to choose whether such services are to be performed by a duly licensed physician or a duly licensed optometrist, notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in any other statute, except that in the case of federally supported programs, federal statutes and rules and regulations shall be followed where mandatory, and shall be paid for on a parity in accordance with a fee schedule established for such services by the department or agency, or both, administering the program.

Acts 1965, ch. 357, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 14-1013, 14-20-313.

71-5-2314. Payment of claims under TennCare partners program.

This section is intended to ensure the prompt and accurate payment of all claims incurred by providers delivering services to enrollees of the TennCare partners program, and to formalize the resolution of all claims disputes arising under the partners program. Accordingly, the standards and requirements set forth at §56-32-126(b), shall be applicable to the TennCare partners program. Specifically, all entities contracting with the state in the partners program shall have the same rights and obligations as defined for TennCare health maintenance organizations at §56-32-126(b). The commissioner of commerce and insurance has the authority to conduct periodic examinations of these entities to verify compliance with this section. Any entity found to be in noncompliance with this section shall be subject to the imposition by the commissioner of the same penalties and other remedies set forth at §56-32-120.

Acts 1999, ch. 276, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 276, § 3 provided that except as provided by the provisions of this section, any costs associated with implementing the provisions of this section shall be paid for with funds that have been appropriated for purposes of administering the TennCare program.